Massachusetts, session 194th, H4579.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
ORDERED that the Town Charter, Article IV, Section 4-3 be amended as noted below:
(b) Boards, Committees and Agencies. - Except as otherwise provided by this charter, the
town manager shall appoint all boards, committees and agencies except ad hoc committees
established by a 2/3 vote of the Town Council to assist the Town Council in carrying out the
Council's responsibilities. Members of all appointed board and committees shall be residents of
the town. All appointments of boards, committees and agencies, as defined with the
administrative code, shall be subject to the ratification of the town council. The town manager
shall form a citizen's advisory committee to help in evaluating and selecting those individuals for
appointment. The number and terms of office of the committee shall be established by ordinance.
of 1